it: Gamma di accordatura: Personalizzato; Drop; Aperto; Standard; Altro
tr: Ayar Aralığı: Özel; Drop; Açık; Standart; Diğer
ro-RO: Gama de acordaj: Personalizat; Drop; Deschis; Standard; Altele
pt-PT: Intervalo de afinação: À medida; Comprimento da cortina; Aberto; Padrão; Outro
th: ช่วงการปรับเสียง: ปรับเข้ารูป; ดรอปสาย; แบบเปิด; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Območje uglaševanja: Po meri; Znižan; Odprt; Standarden; Drugo
nb: Stemmingsområde: Tilpasset; Slipp; Åpen; Standard; Annet
nl: Afstembereik: Aangepast; Drop; Open; Standaard; Andere
zh-CN: 调音范围: 定制; 降调; 开放式; 标准; 其他
fr: Étendue de réglage: Personnalisé; Diminué; Ouvert; Standard; Autre
el: Εύρος συντονισμού: Custom; Βαρύτητας; Ανοιχτή; Κανονικό; Άλλο
bg-BG: Диапазон на настройка: Персонализиран; Намаляване; Отворен; Стандартен; Други
ja: チューニング範囲: カスタム; ドロップ; オープン; スタンダード; その他
fi: Viritysalue: Mukautettu; Pudotus; Avoin; Tavallinen; Muu
zh-TW: 調音範圍: 客製化; 下降; 開放式; 標準; 其他
sv: Stämningsintervall: Anpassad; Sänkning; Öppen; Standard; Övrigt
vi: Phạm vi điều chỉnh: Tùy chỉnh; Độ giảm; Mở; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Khác
pt-BR: Faixa de sintonia: Personalizada; Queda; Aberto; Padrão; Outro
ko: 튜닝 범위: 커스텀; 드롭; 열림; 표준; 기타
sk-SK: Rozsah ladenia: Prispôsobený; Kvapka; Otvorený; Štandardný; Iné
en: Tuning range: Custom; Drop; Open; Standard; Other
da: Tuningområde: Skræddersyet; Drop; Åben; Standard; Andet
hr-HR: Raspon ugađanja: Prilagođeni; Kapljica; Otvoreni; Standardni; Ostalo
pl: Zakres strojenia: Niestandardowe terminy; Spadek; Otwórz; Standard; Inne
de: Abstimmungsbereich: Maßgeschneidert; Drop; Offen; Standard; Sonstiges
ru: Диапазон настройки: Индивидуальный; Пониженный строй; Открытый; Стандартный; Другой
es: Rango de sintonización: Personalizado; Caída; Abierto; Estándar; Otros
hu: Hangolási tartomány: Egyéni; Csepp alakú; Nyitott; Normál; Egyéb
lt-LT: Derinimo diapazonas: Pasirinktinis; Nuleidžiamas; Atviras; Standartinis; Kita
cs: Rozsah ladění: Vlastní; Podladění; Otevřený; Standardní; Jiné